Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.77.030

Bylaws—Meetings.

(1) The council shall adopt bylaws and shall meet at least four times each year and at such other times as determined by the chair who shall give reasonable prior notice to the members.

(2) Councilmembers are expected to consistently attend meetings. The chair of the council may remove any member who misses more than two meetings in any calendar year without cause. Any member so removed must be replaced as provided under RCW 28B.77.005.

[ 2012 c 229 s 105.]